Louisiana, session 2026, HB913.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:1372(3), 1373(C) and (D), 1374(A), (C), and (F) and 1376(A) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 6:1372(5)(c) and (7), 1373(E), 1373.1, and
1374(E)(3) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1372. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms and phrases have the meanings
hereinafter ascribed to them:
* * *
(3) "Covered financial institution" means any bank, credit union, savings
bank, savings and loan association, or trust company, brokerage firm, broker-dealer,
or a financial adviser or investment adviser operating in Louisiana.
* * *
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-754 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 913
(5) "Financial exploitation" means any of the following:
* * *
(c) Manipulating an eligible adult into willingly providing access to or
possession of his money, assets, or property to another person by fraud, duress, or
undue influence.
* * *
(7) "Trusted contact person" means a person who is eighteen years of age or
older whom an eligible adult has authorized a covered financial institution to contact
if the covered financial institution suspects that the eligible adult may be a victim of
financial exploitation.
§1373. Notices
* * *
C.(1) A covered financial institution shall notify each trusted contact person
if the covered financial institution believes that the financial exploitation of an
eligible adult is occurring, has or may have occurred, or is being attempted, or has
been, or may have been attempted.
(2) A covered financial institution shall provide an eligible adult with the
option to designate one or more trusted contact persons at the time the eligible adult
opens an account or contracts for services and at least once annually.
C. D. A covered financial institution may choose not to notify any third party
reasonably associated with the eligible adult of suspected financial exploitation of
the eligible adult, if the covered financial institution believes such third party is, may
be, or may have been engaged in financial exploitation of the eligible adult.
D. E. A covered financial institution shall make a reasonable effort, at least
annually, to notify all employees of the covered financial institution of their ability
to report potential financial exploitation of an eligible adult to personnel within the
covered financial institution.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-754 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 913
§1373.1. Exploitation training programs for covered financial institutions; biannual
requirement
A. A covered financial institution shall develop and implement a training
program to educate its officers and employees on recognizing and responding to the
signs of exploitation of an eligible adult. The training program shall include
instruction on all of the following:
(1) Common methods and warning signs of financial exploitation, including
but not limited to tech support fraud, government impersonation fraud, investment
fraud, romance fraud, and cryptocurrency fraud.
(2) Internal procedures of the covered financial institution for reporting
suspected financial exploitation.
(3) The provisions of this Section.
(4) The transaction delay procedures authorized by R.S. 6:1374.
(5) The trusted contact person procedures required by Subsection C of this
Section.
B. A covered entity shall provide the training required by this Subsection to
each officer and employee upon hiring or within ninety days of the effective date of
this Section, whichever is later, and at least once every two years thereafter.
§1374. Delaying financial transactions
A.(1) A covered financial institution may, but is not required to, delay
completion or execution of a financial transaction involving an account of an eligible
adult, an account on which an eligible adult is a beneficiary, or an account of a
person suspected of perpetrating financial exploitation if either of the following
conditions apply:
(1) (a) The covered financial institution reasonably believes that the requested
financial transaction may result in financial exploitation of an eligible adult.
(2) (b) A covered agency provides information demonstrating to the financial
institution that it is reasonable to believe that financial exploitation is occurring, has
or may have occurred, or is being attempted, or has been, or may have been
attempted.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-754 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 913
(2) A covered financial institution shall delay completion or execution of a
financial transaction involving an account of an eligible adult if the covered financial
institution is expressly directed to do so by a trusted contact person of that eligible
adult.
* * *
C.(1) If a covered financial institution delays a financial transaction pursuant
to Subsection A of this Section, the covered financial institution may provide
notification of the delay, the reason for the delay, and any additional information
about the financial transaction to any covered agency.
(2) If a covered financial institution delays a financial transaction pursuant
to Subsection A of this Section, the covered financial institution shall provide
notification of the delay, the reason for the delay, and any additional information
about the financial transaction to any trusted contact person.
* * *
E. Except as provided in Subsection F of this Section, any delay of a financial
transaction as authorized pursuant to this Section shall expire or be terminated when
the earliest of any of the following circumstances occur:
* * *
(3) The covered financial institution is directed to cease the delay of a
financial transaction by a trusted contact person.
F.
* * *
(2) A covered financial institution shall extend the delay provided for in
Subsection E of this Section upon receiving a request to extend the delay from any
trusted contact person, in which case the delay shall expire or be terminated no later
than twenty-five business days from the date on which the covered financial
institution first initiated the delay of the financial transaction.
(2) (3) A court of competent jurisdiction may enter an order extending or
shortening a delay, or providing other relief, based on the petition of the covered
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-754 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 913
financial institution, any covered agency, any trusted contact person, or other
interested party.
* * *
§1376. Immunity
A.(1) Except as provided in this Chapter, A a covered financial institution
and its directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, agents, and other
representatives shall have no duty to act pursuant to this Chapter or otherwise to
protect an eligible adult from financial exploitation by a third person.
(2) Except as provided in this Chapter, A a covered financial institution and
its directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, agents, and other
representatives shall be immune from all criminal, civil, and administrative liability
for not taking action pursuant to this Chapter.
(3) Except as provided in this Chapter, A a covered financial institution and
its directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, agents, or other
representatives who choose to act pursuant to the authority granted in this Chapter
shall be immune from all criminal, civil, and administrative liability for any act taken
pursuant to this Chapter, unless such act of the financial institution or its
representatives was grossly negligent and caused pecuniary loss to the eligible adult
who was suspected of being a victim of financial exploitation.
* * *